02_Morphology/Hindi/hindi.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%> ! Morpheme boundary

%<n%> ! Noun
%<pl%> ! Plural
%<m%> ! Masculine type 1
%<f1%> ! Feminine type 1
%<f2%> ! Feminine type 2

%{A%}
%{iya%}
%{Ah%}

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON N1
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{A%} CASE ;

LEXICON N2
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>: CASE ;

LEXICON F1
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{iya%} CASE ;

LEXICON F2
%<n%>%<m%>%<sg%>: CASE ;
%<n%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>ें	CASE ;

LEXICON CASE
# ; 

LEXICON Nouns

! Masculine type 1
लड़का:लड़का N1; ! "Boy"
कुरता:कुरता N1;  ! "Male Dress"

! Masculine type 2
आम:आम N2; ! "Mango"
गाँव:गाँव N2;  ! "Village"

!Feminine type 1
लड़्की:लड़्की F1; ! "Girl"
साड़ी:साड़ी F1;   ! "Female Dress"

!Feminine type 2
औरत:औरत F2;  ! "Woman"
बस:बस   F2;  ! "Bus"
